Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3302] Nursing scholars program;
establishment, administration. (a) There is established a program to be
known as the nursing scholars program to be placed administratively within the University of Hawaii.

(b) The University of Hawaii may provide
scholarship grants under the scholarship program to an eligible student who is
a resident in this State upon confirmation from an approved educational
institution that the student has been accepted for enrollment in an approved
graduate course of study. Awarding preference shall be given to Hawaii residents. Scholarship grants shall only be for the amounts set forth in section
[304A-3303(a)] and shall only be used for tuition, books, laboratory fees, and
any other required educational fees and costs.

(c) The University of Hawaii shall establish
lists of approved graduate courses of study for the various types of approved
educational institutions falling within the program.

(d) To receive a scholarship grant under this
chapter, a student shall:

(1) Have graduated from a recognized nursing program
with a bachelor of science in nursing;

(2) Maintain domicile in Hawaii during the term of
the scholarship grants;

(3) Comply with any conditions placed on the
scholarship grant by the University of Hawaii;

(4) Maintain a grade point average of 3.0 or higher,
on a scale of 4.0 or its equivalent; and

(5) Enter into a written agreement with the University of Hawaii to:

(A) Satisfy all degree requirements and other
requirements under this program;

(B) Commence nursing instruction in this
State within one year after completion of an approved graduate degree in
nursing for a period of one year for each academic year the student received a
master's or doctoral degree, for a period of one year for each academic year
the student receives a scholarship grant under this program, unless the
University of Hawaii determines that there are extenuating circumstances; and

(C) Reimburse the State for all amounts
received under this program and interest thereon, as determined by the University of Hawaii, if the student fails to comply with this subsection.

(e) A student applying for the scholarship
shall apply to the University of Hawaii and include all information and
documentation required by the University of Hawaii. The application shall
include a verified statement of grade point average from the appropriate
approved educational institution.

(f) The teaching requirement under subsection
(d)(5)(B) shall begin after the receipt of the master's or doctoral degree. If
a student terminates enrollment in the approved educational institution during
the academic year or prior to completion of the approved graduate course of
study and is eligible to have all or a portion of the tuition payments refunded
under the refund policies of the institution, the approved educational
institution shall notify the University of Hawaii in writing and shall return
all unused portions of the scholarship grant. Returned amounts shall be used
to fund other scholarship grants under this program.

(g) A scholarship grant under this program is
only transferable to another approved educational institution if approved by
the University of Hawaii.

(h) Scholarship grants awarded under the
program shall be limited to funds appropriated for the purpose of awarding
grants or funds otherwise matched by external entities. First priority for
scholarship grant awards shall be given to renewal applicants. [L 2006, c 75,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next